Illinois, session 104th, HB1740.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Freedom of Information Act is amended by 5changing Section 3 as follows: 6    (5 ILCS 140/3)  (from Ch. 116, par. 203)7    Sec. 3. (a) Each public body shall make available to any 8person for inspection or copying all public records, except as 9otherwise provided in Sections 7 and 8.5 of this Act. 10Notwithstanding any other law, a public body may not grant to 11any person or entity, whether by contract, license, or 12otherwise, the exclusive right to access and disseminate any 13public record as defined in this Act.14    (b) Subject to the fee provisions of Section 6 of this Act, 15each public body shall promptly provide, to any person who 16submits a request, a copy of any public record required to be 17disclosed by subsection (a) of this Section and shall certify 18such copy if so requested.19    (c) Requests for inspection or copies shall be made in 20writing and directed to the public body. Written requests may 21be submitted to a public body via personal delivery, mail, 22telefax, or other means available to the public body. A public 23body may honor oral requests for inspection or copying. A   HB1740- 2 -LRB104 06269 BDA 16304 b1public body may not require that a request be submitted on a 2standard form or require the requester to specify the purpose 3for a request, except to determine whether the records are 4requested for a commercial purpose or whether to grant a 5request for a fee waiver. All requests for inspection and 6copying received by a public body shall immediately be 7forwarded to its Freedom of Information officer or designee. 8    (d) Each public body shall, promptly, either comply with 9or deny a request for public records within 5 business days 10after its receipt of the request, unless the time for response 11is properly extended under subsection (e) of this Section or 12unless time of response is covered under subsection (d-5). 13Denial shall be in writing as provided in Section 9 of this 14Act. Failure to comply with a written request, extend the time 15for response, or deny a request within 5 business days after 16its receipt shall be considered a denial of the request. A 17public body that fails to respond to a request within the 18requisite periods in this Section but thereafter provides the 19requester with copies of the requested public records may not 20impose a fee for such copies. A public body that fails to 21respond to a request received may not treat the request as 22unduly burdensome under subsection (g). 23    (d-5) If a request for public records for officer-worn 24body camera recorded audio or video allowed under subsection 25(b) of Section 10-20 of the Law Enforcement Officer-Worn Body 26Camera Act is received by a public body, the public body shall,   HB1740- 3 -LRB104 06269 BDA 16304 b1promptly, either comply with or deny a request for the audio or 2video within 15 business days after its receipt of the 3request. The time for a response under this subsection may be 4extended by the public body for not more than 15 business days 5from the original due date for any of the reasons allowed under 6subsection (e) unless the person making the request and the 7public body make an agreement in writing to extend the time for 8compliance as allowed under subsection (e). 9    (e) Except as provided in subsection (d-5), the The time 10for response under this Section may be extended by the public 11body for not more than 5 business days from the original due 12date for any of the following reasons:13        (i) the requested records are stored in whole or in 14    part at other locations than the office having charge of 15    the requested records;16        (ii) the request requires the collection of a 17    substantial number of specified records;18        (iii) the request is couched in categorical terms and 19    requires an extensive search for the records responsive to 20    it;21        (iv) the requested records have not been located in 22    the course of routine search and additional efforts are 23    being made to locate them;24        (v) the requested records require examination and 25    evaluation by personnel having the necessary competence 26    and discretion to determine if they are exempt from   HB1740- 4 -LRB104 06269 BDA 16304 b1    disclosure under Section 7 of this Act or should be 2    revealed only with appropriate deletions;3        (vi) the request for records cannot be complied with 4    by the public body within the time limits prescribed by 5    subsection (d) of this Section without unduly burdening or 6    interfering with the operations of the public body;7        (vii) there is a need for consultation, which shall be 8    conducted with all practicable speed, with another public 9    body or among 2 or more components of a public body having 10    a substantial interest in the determination or in the 11    subject matter of the request.12    The person making a request and the public body may agree 13in writing to extend the time for compliance for a period to be 14determined by the parties. If the requester and the public 15body agree to extend the period for compliance, a failure by 16the public body to comply with any previous deadlines shall 17not be treated as a denial of the request for the records. 18    (f) When additional time is required for any of the above 19reasons, the public body shall, within 5 business days after 20receipt of the request, notify the person making the request 21of the reasons for the extension and the date by which the 22response will be forthcoming. Failure to respond within the 23time permitted for extension shall be considered a denial of 24the request. A public body that fails to respond to a request 25within the time permitted for extension but thereafter 26provides the requester with copies of the requested public   HB1740- 5 -LRB104 06269 BDA 16304 b1records may not impose a fee for those copies. A public body 2that requests an extension and subsequently fails to respond 3to the request may not treat the request as unduly burdensome 4under subsection (g).5    (g) Requests calling for all records falling within a 6category shall be complied with unless compliance with the 7request would be unduly burdensome for the complying public 8body and there is no way to narrow the request and the burden 9on the public body outweighs the public interest in the 10information. Before invoking this exemption, the public body 11shall extend to the person making the request an opportunity 12to confer with it in an attempt to reduce the request to 13manageable proportions. If any public body responds to a 14categorical request by stating that compliance would unduly 15burden its operation and the conditions described above are 16met, it shall do so in writing, specifying the reasons why it 17would be unduly burdensome and the extent to which compliance 18will so burden the operations of the public body. Such a 19response shall be treated as a denial of the request for 20information. 21    Repeated requests from the same person for the same 22records that are unchanged or identical to records previously 23provided or properly denied under this Act shall be deemed 24unduly burdensome under this provision.25    (h) Each public body may promulgate rules and regulations 26in conformity with the provisions of this Section pertaining   HB1740- 6 -LRB104 06269 BDA 16304 b1to the availability of records and procedures to be followed, 2including:3        (i) the times and places where such records will be 4    made available, and5        (ii) the persons from whom such records may be 6    obtained.7    (i) The time periods for compliance or denial of a request 8to inspect or copy records set out in this Section shall not 9apply to requests for records made for a commercial purpose, 10requests by a recurrent requester, or voluminous requests. 11Such requests shall be subject to the provisions of Sections 123.1, 3.2, and 3.6 of this Act, as applicable. 13(Source: P.A. 101-81, eff. 7-12-19.)